Massachusetts, session 194th, H4319.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 39A of chapter 129 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting, in line 1, before the word “Every”, the
following letter:- (a)
SECTION 2. Said section 39A of said chapter 129 of the General Laws, as so appearing,
is hereby further amended by striking out, in line 13, the word “section”, and inserting in place
thereof the following word:- subsection
SECTION 3. Said section 39A of said chapter 129 of the General Laws, as so appearing,
is hereby further amended by inserting after subsection (a) the following 3 subsections:-
(b) No person engaged in the business of operating a pet shop for which a license must be
obtained pursuant to subsection (a); and are regulated under 330 CMR 12.00 shall sell or offer
for sale a dog, cat, rabbit, or guinea pig.
of 2

(c) Subsection (b) shall not be construed to prohibit a pet shop from offering space to an
animal rescue or shelter organization to showcase dogs, cats, rabbits, or guinea pigs for adoption
so long as the pet shop does not have an ownership interest in the animals offered for adoption.
(d) Nothing in subsections (b) or (c) shall affect the authority of any town, city, or other
locality to regulate or prohibit the sale of dogs, cats, rabbits or guinea pigs.
SECTION 4. This act shall go into effect 90 days after its passage.
of 2